Nevada, session 83, SB108.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 532.230 is hereby amended to read as follows:
532.230 1. The Account for the Channel Clearance,
Maintenance, Restoration, Surveying and Monumenting Program is
hereby created in the State General Fund.
2. The money in the Account must be administered by the State
Engineer and must be expended only to aid local governments or
tribal governments in the manner provided in NRS 532.220.
3. If the balance in the Account that is not committed for
expenditure is below [$250,000,] $500,000, the State Engineer may
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
request an allocation from the Contingency Account pursuant to
NRS 353.266, 353.268 and 353.269.
4. If the balance in the Account is not sufficient to provide a
grant of money to an incorporated city, a county, a political
subdivision of this State or a tribal government in this State, the
State Engineer shall request an allocation from the Contingency
Account pursuant to NRS 353.266, 353.268 and 353.269.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)